Washington statutes.
RCW 18.56.040

Remote technology standards for use.

It is unlawful for any person to offer or otherwise make available to consumers in this state remote technology under this chapter without fully complying with the following:

(1) The remote technology must be approved by the United States food and drug administration when applicable;

(2) The remote technology must be designed and operated in a manner that provides any accommodation required by the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq. when applicable;

(3) The remote technology, when used for the collection and transmission of diagnostic information and data, must gather and transmit any protected health information in compliance with the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and related regulations;

(4) The remote technology, when used for the collection and transmission of diagnostic information and data, may only transmit the diagnostic information and data to a qualified provider, their staff, contracted support staff, or another licensed health care provider for the purposes of collaboration in providing care to the patient. When diagnostic information and data are collected and transmitted through remote technology, that information must be read and interpreted by a qualified provider in order to release a corrective lens prescription to the patient or other entity. Contracted support staff must comply with all requirements of this chapter. Contract support staff and the supervising provider retain personal and professional responsibility for any violation of this chapter by the contracted support staff; and

(5) The owner, lessee, or operator of the remote technology must maintain liability insurance in an amount reasonably sufficient to cover claims which may be made by individuals diagnosed or treated based on information and data by the automated equipment, including but not limited to photographs and scans.

[ 2020 c 241 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—2020 c 241: See note following RCW 18.56.010.